apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<ord%>:%-%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%-ч%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-ш%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-ч%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

! See PRON-COLL
!These are for numerals
!!  Defaults to subst reading; advl is secondary
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{A%}%{U%} # ; ! FIXME: оо/өө
!! though apertium-kaz hasn't been updated to reflect this
!! so let's just include <subst> for now...
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-%{A%}%{U%} # ; ! FIXME: оо/өө
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>:%-%{A%}%>%{U%} SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{т%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{у%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{у%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{у%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

С%<num%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{у%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

! Measurement units

км:км SQRD ;
мм:мм SQRD ;
см:см SQRD ;
м:м SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{й%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "бир"
2:2%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "эки"
3:3%{ү%}%{т%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "үч"
4:4%{ү%}%{т%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "төрт"
5:5%{э%}%{т%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "беш"
6:6%{а%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алты"
7:7%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жети"
8:8%{э%}%{з%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сегиз"
9:9%{у%}%{з%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тогуз"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{о%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "он"
2%0:2%0%{а%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жыйырма"
3%0:3%0%{у%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "отуз"
4%0:4%0%{а%}%{т%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "кырк"
5%0:5%0%{ү%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "элүү"
6%0:6%0%{а%}%{т%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алтымыш"
7%0:7%0%{э%}%{т%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жетимиш"
8%0:8%0%{э%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сексен"
9%0:9%0%{о%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "токсон"

LEXICON POWERS
%0%0:%0%0%{ү%}%{з%}     NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жүз"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{э%}%{з%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "миң"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;


!! merged from secondary DIGITLEX lexicon;
!! CHECK: may not belong here!
%<num%>: # ; ! Copy from kaz



!==============================================================================!
!          N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E
!==============================================================================!


LEXICON CASES-DEFAULT
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;              ! -     -      -
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;   ! -нын, -нин, -дын, -дин, -тын, -тин, -нун, -нүн, -дун, -дүн, -тун, -түн
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;    ! -га, -ка, -ге, -ке, -го, -ко, -гө, -кө
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;    ! -ны, -ни, -ды, -ди, -ты, -ти, -ну, -нү, -ду, -дү, -ту, -тү
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;  ! -да, -де, -та, -те, -до, -дө, -то, -тө
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й PRED ;  ! -дай, -дей, -дөй, -дой, -тай, -тей, -төй, той

LEXICON CASES
CASES-DEFAULT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! -DA and -DAn can be predicates

LEXICON CASES-PX12SG
CASES-DEFAULT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<abl%>:%>%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON NIKI
%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON GEN-POS
CASES ;
NIKI ;
DAGI ;

LEXICON GEN-POS-PX12SG
CASES-PX12SG ;
NIKI ;
DAGI ;

LEXICON GEN-POS-NONOM
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;
NIKI ;
DAGI ;

LEXICON POSSESSION
GEN-POS ;
POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

LEXICON POSSESSION-NONOM
GEN-POS-NONOM ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GEN-POS-PX12SG ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GEN-POS-PX12SG ;
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GEN-POS ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GEN-POS ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р GEN-POS ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GEN-POS ;

LEXICON POSSESSION-ENDINGS  ! P_2
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GEN-POS-PX12SG ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GEN-POS-PX12SG ;
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GEN-POS ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GEN-POS ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р GEN-POS ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GEN-POS ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%[%+p3pl%]:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON EXI

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>: ATTR ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-SUFFIX

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LUU-SUFFIX

%+луу%<post%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON SUBST-COMMON

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;

POSSESSION ;
ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;
LUU-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<n%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
%<n%>:%- POSSESSION ;
%<n%>%<gen%>:%-%>нын # ;  ! FIXME: needs rules and all

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES ;
POSSESSION ;
ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;
LUU-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON N-INFL-SG  ! nouns with no/irregular plural

%<n%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
%<n%>: POSSESSION ;
%<n%>: CASES ;
%<n%>: ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;
%<n%>: LUU-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON N-INFL-PL  ! for irregular plurals

%<n%>%<pl%>: POSSESSION ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: CASES ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: LUU-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON N1  ! FIXME

N-INFL ;

LEXICON N6

:%{і%} N-INFL ;
N-INFL ;  ! Dir/LR     ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                       ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

LEXICON N-INFL      ! Nouns that have a LUU attributive form

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;


LEXICON N-INFL-KI   ! Nouns that have a KI attributive form

%<n%>: KI ;
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-INFL-NKI

%<n%>:%{I%}н KI ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>:%{I%}ң KI ;
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;
POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;  ! for stuff like "биздин аба ырайыбыз" and even "анын аба ырайы",
                      ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis

LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

POSSESSION ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND

%<np%>%<org%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N-INFL ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%- POSSESSION ;  ! Dir/LR  Generate without dash, but allow analysis of forms with dash

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON Pronouns
бул%<det%>%<dem%>%+жак%<n%>:быяк POSSESSION ; ! "here"
ал%<det%>%<dem%>%+жак%<n%>:аяк POSSESSION ; ! "there"
кай%<det%>%<dem%>%+жак%<n%>:каяк POSSESSION ; ! "where"
LEXICON Nouns
аба% жолу:аба% жол N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "airline"
аба% майданы:аба% майдан N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ;
аба% ырайы:аба% ырай N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "weather"
айыптоо% сөзү:айыптоо% сөз N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! ""  FIXME: MT-only?
акт:акт N6 ; ! ""
антракт:антракт N6 ;
апта:апта N-INFL ; ! "week" (dialectal)
бала:бала N-INFL-SG ; ! "child"
бала:балдар N-INFL-PL ; ! "children"
батинке:батинке N-INFL ; ! ""
гамета:гамета N-INFL ; ! ""
диалект:диалект N6 ;
дүйнөнүн% төрт% бурчу:дүйнөнүн% төрт% бурч N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "the four corners of the world"   ! Use/MT
еге:еге N-INFL ; ! ?? FIXME
жаштар% үйү:жаштар% үй N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ;
жер% алды:жер% алд N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ;
жүк:жүк N-INFL ;
интеллект:интеллект N6 ;
калыс:калыс N-INFL ;
клан:клан N-INFL ;
контракт:контракт N6 ;
кыз:кыз N-INFL ; ! "girl"
мажилис:мажилис N-INFL ;
муун:муун N-INFL ; ! "joint, generation"
наристе% кези:наристе% кез N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "baby-hood" ! Use/MT
объект:объект N6 ;
пакт:пакт N6 ;
папа:папа N-INFL ;
проект:проект N6 ;
пункт:пункт N6 ;
реформа:реформа N-INFL ;
риск:риск N6 ;
субъект:субъект N6 ;
теңтуш:теңтуш N-INFL ;
факт:факт N6 ;
чет% өлкө:чет% өлкө N-INFL ; ! "foreign country"
экинчи% күнү:экинчи% күнү N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND ; ! "Tuesday"
ДНК:ДНК%{а%} N1-ABBR ; ! "DNA"
америкалык:америкалык N1 ; ! ""
англичан:англичан N1 ; ! "English"
афган:афган N1 ; ! ""
британ:британ N1 ; ! ""
грек:грек N1 ; ! "Greek"
дунган:дуңган N1 ; ! "Dungan"     ! Dir/LR
карел:карел N1 ; ! ""
латын:латын N1 ; ! "Latin"
немис:немис N1 ; ! "German"
славян:славян N1 ; ! ""
түркмөн:түркмөн N1 ; ! "Turkmen"
урду:урду N1 ; ! ""
швед:швед N1 ; ! ""
күз:күз N-INFL-KI ; ! "fall"/"fall-time"
кыш:кыш N-INFL-KI ; ! "winter"/"wintery"
жаз:жаз N-INFL-KI ; ! "spring"/"spring-time"
жай:жай N-INFL-KI ; ! "summer"/"summery"
соң:соң N-INFL-KI ; ! "end"/"final"
тыш:тыш N-INFL-KI ; ! "outside"/"outer"
сырт:сырт N-INFL-KI ; ! "outside"/"outer"
ич:ич N-INFL-KI ; ! "inside"/"inner"
төмөн:төмөн N-INFL-KI ; ! "bottom"/"following/below"
жыл:жыл N-INFL-KI ; ! "year"
күн:күн N-INFL-KI ; ! "day"
кеч:кеч N-INFL-KI ; ! "evening"
алд:алд N-INFL-NKI ; ! "front/forward", "forward"
арт:арт N-INFL-NKI ; ! "back, behind", "rear"
аст:аст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "bottom", "lower"
аст:ас%{т%} N-INFL-NKI ; ! "bottom; underneath, below"
үст:үст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "top", "upper"
орто:орто N-INFL-NKI ; ! "middle/center", "central"
LEXICON ProperNouns
Армения:Армения NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бишкек:Бишкек NP-TOP ; ! ""
Венеция:Венеция NP-TOP ;
Дакар:Дакар NP-TOP ;
Иерусалим:Иерусалим NP-TOP ; ! "Jerusalem"
Казак% АССР:Казак% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Казак% ССР:Казак% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Камерун:Камерун NP-TOP ; ! ""
Каракалпак% АССР:Каракалпак% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Кыргыз% АССР:Кыргыз% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ;
Кыргыз% ССР:Кыргыз% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ;
Мадрид:Мадрид NP-TOP ; ! ""
Папуа:Папуа NP-TOP ; ! ""
Тажик% ССР:Тажик% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Таллин:Таллин NP-TOP ;
Татар% АССР:Татар% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Туркестан% АССР:Туркестан% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Украина% ССР:Украина% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Шинжаң:Шинжаң NP-TOP ;
Өзбек% ССР:Өзбек% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Медеу:Медеу NP-TOP ; ! "Medew"
Волга:Волга NP-TOP ; ! "Volga river"
Түрк% Аба% Жолдору:Түрк% Аба% Жолдор NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "Turkish Airlines"
Чемпиондор% лигасы:Чемпиондор% лига NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "UEFA Champions League"
Илим% Академиясы:Илим% Академия NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "Academy of Sciences"
LEXICON Adjectives
бар:бар EXI ;
жок:жок EXI ;
LEXICON Adverbs
ассамча:ассамча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
белорусча:белорусча ADV-LANG ; ! "" CHECK
гаитиче:гаитиче ADV-LANG ; ! ""
еврейче:еврейче ADV-LANG ; ! "Jewish/Jew"
итальянча:итальянча ADV-LANG ; ! "Italian"
курт:курт ADV-LANG ; ! ""
люксембургча:люксембургча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
моңголчо:моңголчо ADV-LANG ; ! "Mongol"
полякча:полякча ADV-LANG ; ! "Polish"
словакча:словакча ADV-LANG ; ! ""
туркчо:туркчо ADV-LANG ; ! ""
фароэче:фароэче ADV-LANG ; ! ""
